Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.540

Records preservation.

Registration records of persons whose voter registrations have been canceled as authorized under this title must be preserved in the manner prescribed by rule by the secretary of state. Information from such canceled registration records is available for public inspection and copying to the same extent established by RCW 29A.08.710 for other voter registration information.

[ 2004 c 267 s 127; 2003 c 111 s 235. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 26; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 32; 1965 ex.s. c 156 s 1; 1965 c 9 s 29.10.110; prior: 1961 c 32 s 2; 1947 c 85 s 5; 1933 c 1 s 21; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 5114-21. Formerly RCW 29.10.110.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.